Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3522
Care and services; liability.

Persons to whom care and services have been rendered shall be liable for the cost and fees of such care and services to the appropriate county, counties or hospital district maintaining and operating the hospital providing such care and services. In cases where the person receiving the care and services is a minor child, the parents of such minor patient shall be liable jointly and severally for the costs and fees of such care and services to the appropriate county, counties or hospital district maintaining and operating the hospital providing such care and services. In cases where the person receiving such care and services is married, both the patient and the patient's spouse shall be jointly and severally liable for the cost and fees of such care and services to the appropriate county, counties or hospital district maintaining and operating the hospital providing such care and services. In cases where the person receiving such care and services is under guardianship, the guardian, to the extent of the value of the estate of the ward controlled by the guardian, shall be liable for the cost and fees of such care and services to the appropriate county, counties or hospital district maintaining and operating the hospital providing such care and services. Persons, not otherwise legally liable for the care of another, may enter into an agreement with such hospitals for the care of such person and having done so shall be liable to the hospital providing such care for the costs and fees of such care provided.

Laws 1971, LB 908, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.70.